test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/V-TI-miciw_gt-norm.yaml
Condfig:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mîciw - help : # Wolvengrey VTI 3

     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimîcin
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimîcin
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimîcinân
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimîcinânaw, kimîcinaw]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimîcinâwâw
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mîciw
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mîciwak
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: mîciyiwa
     
     PV/e+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mîciyân, êmîciyân]
     PV/e+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mîciyan, êmîciyan]
     PV/e+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mîciyâhk, êmîciyâhk]
     PV/e+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mîciyahk, êmîciyahk]
     PV/e+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mîciyêk, êmîciyêk]
     PV/e+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mîcit, êmîcit]
     PV/e+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mîcicik, êmîcicik]
     PV/e+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mîciyit, êmîciyit]
     
     mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: mîciyâni
     mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: mîciyani
     mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: mîciyâhki
     mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [mîciyahko, mîciyahki]
     mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: mîciyêko
     mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mîcici
     mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mîcitwâwi
     mîciw+V+TI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mîciyici
     
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîci
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mîcik
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mîcitân
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mîcihkan
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mîcihkêk
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mîcihkahk
